California statutes. Civil Code
Carriers without reward are subject to the same rules as employGs without reward, except so far as is otherwise provided by this Title.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2090.

A carrier without reward, who has begun to perform his undertaking, must complete it in like manner as if he had received a reward, unless he restores the person or thing carried to as favorable a position as before he commenced the carriage.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Carriage of Persons [2096. - 2104.]



  ARTICLE 1. Gratuitous Carriage of Persons [2096. - 2096.]

2096.

A carrier of persons without reward must use ordinary care and diligence for their safe carriage.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Carriage for Reward [2100. - 2104.]

2100.

A carrier of persons for reward must use the utmost care and diligence for their safe carriage, must provide everything necessary for that purpose, and must exercise to that end a reasonable degree of skill.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

A carrier of persons for reward is bound to provide vehicles safe and fit for the purposes to which they are put, and is not excused for default in this respect by any degree of care.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

A carrier of persons for reward must not overcrowd or overload his vehicle.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

A carrier of persons for reward must give to passengers all such accommodations as are usual and reasonable, and must treat them with civility, and give them a reasonable degree of attention.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

A carrier of persons for reward must travel at a reasonable rate of speed, and without any unreasonable delay, or deviation from his proper route.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Carriage of Property [2110. - 2144.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Definitions [2110. - 2110.]

2110.

Property carried is called freight; the reward, if any, to be paid for its carriage is called freightage; the person who delivers the freight to the carrier is called the consignor; and the person to whom it is to be delivered is called the consignee.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Obligations of the Carrier [2114. - [2121.]]

2114.

A carrier of property for reward must use at least ordinary care and diligence in the performance of all his duties. A carrier without reward must use at least slight care and diligence.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.

Subject to Section 7303 of the Uniform Commercial Code, a carrier must comply with the directions of the consignor or consignee to the same extent that an employee is bound to comply with those of his employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2118.

Subject to Section 7303 of the Uniform Commercial Code, a carrier of property must deliver it to the consignee, at the place to which it is addressed, in the manner usual at that place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

2119.

If there is no usage to the contrary at the place of delivery, freight must be delivered as follows:

1. If carried upon a railway owned or managed by the carrier, it may be delivered at the station nearest to the place to which it is addressed;

2. If carried by sea from a foreign country, it may be delivered at the wharf where the ship moors, within a reasonable distance from the place of address; or, if there is no wharf, on board a lighter alongside the ship; or,

3. Subject
 to Section 7303 of the Uniform Commercial Code, in other cases, it must be delivered to the consignee or his agent, personally, if either can, with reasonable diligence, be found.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

[2120.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Twenty. If, for any reason, a carrier does not deliver freight to the consignee or his agent personally, he must give notice to the consignee of its arrival, and keep the same in safety, upon his responsibility as a warehouseman, until the consignee has had a reasonable time to remove it. If the place of residence or business of the consignee be unknown to the carrier, he may give the notice by letter dropped in the nearest Post Office.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

[2121.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Twenty-one. If a consignee does not accept and remove freight within a reasonable time after the carrier has fulfilled his obligation to deliver, or duly offered to fulfill the same, the carrier may exonerate himself from further liability by placing the freight in a suitable warehouse, on storage, on account of the consignee, and giving notice thereof to him.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Freightage [2136. - 2144.]

2136.

A carrier may require his freightage to be paid upon his receiving the freight; but if he does not demand it then, he cannot until he is ready to deliver the freight to the consignee.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2137.

The consignor of freight is presumed to be liable for the freightage, but if the contract between him and the carrier provides that the consignee shall pay it, and the carrier allows the consignee to take the freight, he cannot afterwards recover the freightage from the consignor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2138.

The consignee of freight is liable for the freightage, if he accepts the freight with notice of the intention of the consignor that he should pay it.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2139.

No freightage can be charged upon the natural increase of freight.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2140.

If freightage is apportioned by a bill of lading or other contract made between a consignor and carrier, the carrier is entitled to payment, according to the apportionment, for so much as he delivers.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2141.

If a part of the freight is accepted by a consignee, without a specific objection that the rest is not delivered, the freightage must be apportioned and paid as to that part, though not apportioned in the original contract.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2142.

If a consignee voluntarily receives freight at a place short of the one appointed for delivery, the carrier is entitled to a just proportion of the freightage, according to distance. If the carrier, being ready and willing, offers to complete the transit, he is entitled to the full freightage. If he does not thus offer completion, and the consignee receives the freight only from necessity, the carrier is not entitled to any freightage.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2143.

If freight is carried further, or more expeditiously, than was agreed upon by the parties, the carrier is not entitled to additional compensation, and cannot refuse to deliver it, on the demand of the consignee, at the place and time of its arrival.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2144.

A carrier has a lien for (a) freightage and for services rendered at request of shipper or consignee in and about the transportation of the property, (b) care and preservation of the property, (c) money advanced at request of shipper or consignee to discharge a prior lien, and (d), subject to the limitations specified in Section 3051.6, any fines, penalties, costs, expenses, and interest arising from the provision of false or erroneous certifications of gross cargo weight as required by Section 508 of Title 49 of the United States Code. The carrier’s rights
 to this lien are regulated by the title on liens.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 757, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Carriage of Messages [2161. - [2162.]]

2161.

A carrier of messages for reward, other than by telegraph or telephone, must deliver them at the place to which they are addressed, or to the person for whom they are intended. Such carrier, by telegraph or telephone, must deliver them at such place and to such person, providedthe place of address, or the person for whom they are intended, is within a distance of two miles from the main office of the carrier in the city or town to which the messages are transmitted, and the carrier is not required, in making the delivery, to pay on his route toll or ferriage; but for any distance beyond one mile from such office, compensation may be charged for a messenger
employed by the carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 469.)
-------------------------------------------

[2162.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Sixty-two. A carrier of messages for reward, must use great care and diligence in the transmission and delivery of messages.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Common Carriers [[2168.] - 2212.]



  ARTICLE 1. Common Carriers in General [[2168.] - 2178.]

[2168.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Sixty-eight. Every one who offers to the public to carry persons, property, or messages, excepting only telegraphic messages, is a common carrier of whatever he thus offers to carry.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2169.

A common carrier must, if able to do so, accept and carry whatever is offered to him, at a reasonable time and place, of a kind that he undertakes or is accustomed to carry.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2170.

A common carrier must not give preference in time, price, or otherwise, to one person over another. Every common carrier of passengers by railroad, or by vessel plying upon waters lying wholly within this State, shall establish a schedule time for the starting of trains or vessel from their respective stations or wharves, of which public notice shall be given, and shall, weather permitting, except in case of accident or detention caused by connecting lines, start their said trains or vessel at or within ten minutes after the scheduled time so established and notice given, under a penalty of two hundred and fifty dollars for each neglect so to do, to be recovered by
 action before any Court of competent jurisdiction, upon complaint filed by the District Attorney of the county in the name of the people, and paid into the Common School Fund of the said county.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

2171.

A common carrier must always give a preference in time, and may give a preference in price, to the United States and to this State.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[2172.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Seventy-two. A common carrier must start at such time and place as he announces to the public, unless detained by accident or the elements, or in order to connect with carriers on other lines of travel.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2173.

A common carrier is entitled to a reasonable compensation and no more, which he may require to be paid in advance. If payment thereof is refused, he may refuse to carry.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[2174.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Seventy-four. The obligations of a common carrier cannot be limited by general notice on his part, but may be limited by special contract.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2175.

A common carrier cannot be exonerated, by any agreement made in anticipation thereof, from liability for the gross negligence, fraud, or willful wrong of himself or his servants.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[2176.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Seventy-six. A passenger, consignor, or consignee, by accepting a ticket, bill of lading, or written contract for carriage, with a knowledge of its terms, assents to the rate of hire, the time, place, and manner of delivery therein stated; and also to the limitation stated therein upon the amount of the carrier’s liability in case property carried in packages, trunks, or boxes, is lost or injured, when the value of such property is not named; and also to the limitation stated therein to the carrier’s liability for loss or injury to live animals carried. But his assent to any other modification of the carrier’s
 obligations contained in such instrument can be manifested only by his signature to the same.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

[2177.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Seventy-seven. A common carrier is not responsible for loss or miscarriage of a letter, or package having the form of a letter, containing money or notes, bills of exchange, or other papers of value, unless he be informed at the time of its receipt of the value of its contents.

(History: Added by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2178.

A common carrier of property by steam or electric railroad which accepts for transportation, storage, handling or safe-keeping, as a part of or in connection with passenger transportation, property carried in trunks, valises, suit cases, traveling bags, boxes, bundles or packages, shall not be liable, in the event of loss of or injury to the same, for more than one hundred dollars for each trunk and contents, nor more than fifty dollars for each valise and contents, or suit case and contents, or traveling bag and contents, nor more than ten dollars for each box, bundle or package and contents, unless the carrier shall have consented in writing to assume a greater
 liability. The term “common carrier” as used in this section shall include sleeping car companies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1931, Ch. 614.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Common Carriers of Persons [2180. - 2191.]

2180.

A common carrier of persons, unless his vehicle is fitted for the reception of persons exclusively, must receive and carry a reasonable amount of baggage for each passenger without charge, except for an excess of weight over one hundred pounds to a passenger; if such carrier is a proprietor of a stage line, he need not receive and carry for each passenger by such stage line, without charge, more than sixty pounds of baggage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------

2181.

Luggage may consist of whatever the passenger takes with him for his personal use and convenience, according to the habits or wants of the particular class to which he belongs, either with reference to the important necessities or to the ultimate purposes of his journey. Luggage within the meaning of this section shall include the samples, case, wares, appliances and catalogs of commercial travelers or their employers, used by them for the purpose of transacting their business and carried with them solely for that purpose, when securely packed and locked in substantial trunks or sample cases of convenient shape and weight for handling. No crate cover or other
 protection shall be required for any bicycle carried as luggage, but no passenger shall be entitled to carry as luggage more than one bicycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1911, Ch. 363.)
-------------------------------------------

2182.

The liability of a carrier for luggage received by him with a passenger is the same as that of a common carrier of property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[2183.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Eighty-three. A common carrier must deliver every passenger’s luggage, whether within the prescribed weight or not, immediately upon the arrival of the passenger at his destination; and, unless the vehicle would be overcrowded or overloaded thereby, must carry it on the same vehicle by which he carries the passenger to whom it belonged, except that where luggage is transported by rail, it must be checked and carried in a regular baggage car; and whenever passengers neglect or refuse to have their luggage so checked and transported, it is carried at their risk.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2184.

A common carrier of persons must provide a sufficient number of vehicles to accommodate all the passengers who can be reasonably expected to require carriage at any one time. This section shall not apply, however, to any passenger stage corporation or street railroad corporation, as defined in Sections 226 and 232, respectively, of the Public Utilities Code, which is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 511.)
-------------------------------------------

2185.

A common carrier of persons must provide every passenger with a seat. He must not overload his vehicle by receiving and carrying more passengers than its rated capacity allows. This section shall not apply, however, to any city, county, city and county that operates a transportation system, or to any passenger stage corporation or street railroad corporation, as defined in Sections 226 and 232, respectively, of the Public Utilities Code, which is subject to the jursidiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1409.)
-------------------------------------------

2186.

A common carrier of persons may make rules for the conduct of his business, and may require passengers to conform to them, if they are lawful, public, uniform in their application, and reasonable.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2187.

A common carrier may demand the fare of passengers, either at starting or at any subsequent time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.

A passenger who refuses to pay his fare or to conform to any lawful regulation of the carrier, may be ejected from the vehicle by the carrier. But this must be done with as little violence as possible, and at any usual stopping place or near some dwelling house.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2190.

After having ejected a passenger, a carrier has no right to require the payment of any part of his fare.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.

A common carrier has a lien upon the luggage of a passenger for the payment of such fare as he is entitled to from him. This lien is regulated by the Title on Liens.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Common Carriers of Property [2194. - 2205.]

2194.

Unless the consignor accompanies the freight and retains exclusive control thereof, an inland common carrier of property is liable, from the time that he accepts until he relieves himself from liability pursuant to Sections 2118 to 2122, for the loss or injury thereof from any cause whatever, except:

1. An inherent defect, vice, or weakness, or a spontaneous action, of the property itself;

2. The act of a public enemy of the United States, or of this State;

3. The act of the law; or,

4. Any irresistible superhuman cause.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2195.

A common carrier is liable, even in the cases excepted by the last section, if his want of ordinary care exposes the property to the cause of the loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 455.)
-------------------------------------------

[2196.]

Section Twenty-one Hundred and Ninety-six. A common carrier is liable for delay only when it is caused by his want of ordinary care and diligence.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2197.

(a) Liability for storage or equipment rental charges assessed against a motor carrier by a railroad or steamship company shall be as follows if the charges arise out of a delay caused by the consignor or consignee of the freight: 

(1) The consignor is liable to the motor carrier for the charges if the consignor caused the delay.

(2) The consignee is liable to the motor carrier for the charges if the consignee caused the delay.

(b) Nothing
 in this section shall affect the rights, duties, and obligations between a railroad or steamship company and a motor carrier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 937, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2197.5.

(a) In addition to the liability established by Section 2197, the consignee is liable to the motor carrier for the charges if the freight is shipped prepaid and the delay was caused by either the consignor or the consignee.

(b) Nothing in this section shall affect the rights, duties, and obligations between a railroad or steamship company and a motor carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

[2200.]

Section Twenty-two Hundred. A common carrier of gold, silver, platina, or precious stones, or of imitations thereof, in a manufactured or unmanufactured state; of timepieces of any description; of negotiable paper or other valuable writings; of pictures, glass, or chinaware; of statuary, silk, or laces; or of plated ware of any kind, is not liable for more than fifty dollars upon the loss or injury of any one package of such articles, unless he has notice, upon his receipt thereof, by mark upon the package or otherwise, of the nature of the freight; nor is such carrier liable upon any package carried for more than the value of the articles
 named in the receipt or the bill of lading.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2203.

In respect to any service rendered by a common carrier about freight, other than its carriage and delivery, his rights and obligations are defined by the Titles on Deposit and Service.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[2204.]

Section Twenty-two Hundred and Four. If, from any cause other than want of ordinary care and diligence on his part, a common carrier is unable to deliver perishable property transported by him, and collect his charges thereon, he may cause the property to be sold in open market to satisfy his lien for freightage.

(History: Added by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.

The liability of any stageline, transfer company, or other common carriers operating over the public highways for the loss of or for damage to any baggage shall not exceed the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each trunk and its contents; two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each valise, suitcase or traveling bag and its contents; or two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each box, bundle, or package and its contents, unless a higher valuation is declared at the time of delivery of such baggage to the carrier and assented thereto in writing by such carrier.

All baggage presented to the carrier for checking shall be
 appropriately tagged by the owner with his name and address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1653.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Common Carriers of Messages [2207. - 2209.]

2207.

A carrier of messages by telegraph must, if it is practicable, transmit every such message immediately upon its receipt. But if this is not practicable, and several messages accumulate upon his hands, he must transmit them in the following order:

1. Messages from public agents of the United States or of this State, on public business;

2. Messages intended in good faith for immediate publication in newspapers, and not for any secret use;

3. Messages giving information relating to the sickness or
 death of any person;

4. Other messages in the order in which they were received.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.

A common carrier of messages, otherwise than by telegraph, must transmit messages in the order in which he receives them, except messages from agents of the United States or of this State, on public business, to which he must always give priority. But he may fix upon certain times for the simultaneous transmission of messages previously received.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

2209.

Every person whose message is refused or postponed, contrary to the provisions of this Chapter, is entitled to recover from the carrier his actual damages, and fifty dollars in addition thereto.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Space Flight Liability and Immunity [2210. - 2212.]

2210.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Participant” means a space flight participant as defined in Section 50902 of Title 51 of the United States Code.

(b) “Participant injury” means a bodily injury, including death, emotional injury, or property damage, sustained by the participant.

(c) “Space
 flight activities” means launch services or reentry services as defined in Section 50902 of Title 51 of the United States Code.

(d) “Space flight entity” means any public or private entity that holds, either directly or through a corporate subsidiary or parent, a license, permit, or other authorization issued by the United States Federal Aviation Administration pursuant to the federal Commercial Space Launch Amendments Act of 2004 (51 U.S.C. Sec. 50905 et seq.), including, but not limited to, a safety approval and a payload determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 416, Sec. 2.   (AB 2243)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2211.

(a) A space flight entity providing space flight activities to a participant shall have each participant sign a warning statement that shall contain, at a minimum, and in addition to any language required by federal law, the following notice:
“WARNING AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT: I understand and acknowledge that, under
 California law, there is limited civil liability for bodily injury, including death, emotional injury, or property damage, sustained by a participant as a result of the inherent risks associated with space flight activities provided by a space flight entity. I have given my informed consent to participate in space flight activities after receiving a description of the inherent risks associated with space flight activities, as required by federal law pursuant to Section 50905 of Title 51 of the United States Code and Section 460.45 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The consent that I have given acknowledges that the inherent risks associated with space flight activities include, but are not limited to, risk of bodily injury, including death, emotional injury, and property damage. I understand and acknowledge that I am participating in space flight activities at my own risk. I have been given the opportunity to consult with an attorney before signing this statement.”
(b) Failure to comply with the requirements provided in this section shall prevent a space flight entity from invoking the privileges of immunity provided by Section 2212.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to be contrary to the public policy of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 48, Sec. 1.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2212.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a space flight entity shall not be liable for participant injury arising out of space flight activities if both of the following apply: 

(1) The participant has been informed of the risks associated with space flight activities as required by federal law and Section 2211.

(2) The participant
 has given his or her informed consent that he or she is voluntarily participating in space flight activities after having been informed of the risks associated with those activities, as required by federal law and Section 2211.

(b) If informed consent is given pursuant to subdivision (a), a participant, his or her representative, including the heirs, administrators, executors, assignees, next of kin, and estate of the participant, or any person who attempts to bring a claim on behalf of the participant for a participant injury, shall not be authorized to maintain an action against, or recover from, a space flight entity for a participant injury that resulted from the risks associated with space flight activities, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent or limit the liability of a space flight entity that does any of the following: 

(1) Commits an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant, and that act or omission proximately causes a participant injury.

(2) Intentionally causes a participant injury.

(3) Has actual knowledge or reasonably should have known of a dangerous condition on the land or in the facilities or equipment used in space flight activities and the dangerous condition proximately causes injury, damage, or death to the participant.

(d) Any limitation on legal liability afforded by this section to a space flight entity is in addition to any other limitations of legal liability otherwise provided by law. 

(e) Nothing in this section
 shall be construed to limit the liability of a manufacturer of a part or component used in space flight activities if a defective part or component proximately causes an injury to the participant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 416, Sec. 2.   (AB 2243)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Carrier of Passengers Act of 2024 [2213. - 2218.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title [2213. - 2213.]

2213.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Carrier of Passengers Act of 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   (AB 2780)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [2214. - 2214.]

2214.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Carrier of passengers” means a motor carrier, passenger carrier, or charter-party carrier of passengers that operates a motor vehicle, on a commercial or for-hire basis, and engages in the embarkation and disembarkation of passengers.

(b) “Charter-party carrier of passengers” has the same meaning as used in Section 5360 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) “Disembarkation” means the physical discharge of passengers from a transportation service provided by a carrier of passengers at a geographic location within California.

(d) “Embarkation” means the physical commencement of a transportation service provided by a carrier of passengers.

(e) “Motor vehicle” has the same meaning as used in Section 5359 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 32.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions [2215. - 2215.]

2215.

(a) (1) This chapter applies to any carrier of passengers operating a motor vehicle who knows or reasonably should know that the motor vehicle will be transporting, from embarkation, 10 or more passengers who are likely to seek emergency shelter and other immediate services upon disembarkation.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “likely to seek emergency shelter and other immediate services upon disembarkation” may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Temporary housing or shelter.

(B) Food.

(C) Clothing.

(D) Medical screenings.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, there is a presumption that passengers who have arrived in the United States within 30 days of embarkation are likely to seek emergency shelter and other immediate services upon disembarkation.

(c) At least 24 hours before embarkation, a carrier of passengers shall provide
 electronic notice to a designated point of contact at the governing body of the city, county, or city and county with jurisdiction at the geographic location of disembarkation. This
 electronic notice shall include all of the following information:

(1) The anticipated date and time of arrival of passengers at the geographic location of disembarkation and the address of the geographic location.

(2) The waybill or trip report, consistent with Section 5381.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(3) The number of passengers on the motor vehicle who the carrier of passengers knows or reasonably should know arrived in
 the United States within 30 days of embarkation, and, if the carrier of passengers has relevant information, the number of these passengers that are likely to seek emergency shelter and other immediate services upon disembarkation.

(4) A description of the motor vehicle, including the color, the license plate number, and any logo or other information printed on the exterior of the motor vehicle to assist local officials in identifying the motor vehicle.

(d) (1) The governing body of the city, county, or city and county with jurisdiction at the geographic location of disembarkation
 may designate a specific location of disembarkation within the governing body’s jurisdiction.

(2) A governing body described in paragraph (1) that elects to designate a specific location of disembarkation pursuant to paragraph (1) shall post notice of that location
 on the governing body’s internet website. The carrier of passengers shall check the internet website before embarkation. If the location of disembarkation is not posted on the internet website, the carrier of passengers may disembark at the geographic location they specify pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(e) If a governing body described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) elects to designate a specific location of disembarkation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), and has provided electronic notice of that location pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (d) or posted notice of that location on the governing body’s internet website pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), disembarkation shall only occur at that location.

(f) (1) The location of disembarkation, including the city and county, shall be made known to, and agreed to by, each passenger before embarkation.

(2) If the passenger is a minor, then the location of disembarkation shall be made known to, and agreed to by, the minor passenger’s parent or guardian before embarkation. The notice and agreement shall be done in the passenger’s primary language.

(g) A governing body shall not share, disclose, or otherwise make accessible to any immigration authority, as defined in Section 7284.4 of the Government Code, any information shared or received pursuant to any provision of this chapter without a court-ordered subpoena or judicial warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   (AB 2780)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Civil Action and Penalties [2216. - 2216.]

2216.

(a) Any of the following parties may bring a civil action seeking preventive relief, including for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against the carrier of passengers, for one or more violations of this chapter:

(1) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney.

(2) A passenger who was transported in violation of this chapter.

(3) A homeless service provider or shelter, a health care service provider, or a nonprofit social service provider that suffered a direct violation of this chapter.

(b) A carrier of passengers that violates this chapter, or whose employee violates this chapter, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each act of transporting a person that resulted in one or more violations of this chapter.

(c) Article 6 (commencing with Section 5411) of Chapter 8 of the Public Utilities Code does not apply for purposes of this chapter.

(d) The Attorney General, a district attorney, or a city attorney may bring the action described in subdivision (b).

(e) A prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to attorney’s fees and costs in any action brought pursuant to
 subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   (AB 2780)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Applicability [2217. - 2217.]

2217.

(a) This chapter does not preempt, limit, prohibit, or otherwise affect the adoption, implementation, or enforcement of any local ordinance, code, regulation, or order related to carrier of passenger transportation services, except only to the extent that the local ordinance, code, regulation, or order is inconsistent with this chapter. Any local ordinance, code, regulation, or order is not inconsistent with this chapter if it affords greater protection to passengers than the requirements set forth in this chapter. Any local ordinance, code, regulation, or order that duplicates or supplements this chapter shall be construed as providing
 additional remedies to those set forth in this chapter, and shall not be construed to preempt, limit, prohibit, or otherwise affect this chapter.

(b) This chapter shall only be implemented to the extent that implementation is consistent with federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   (AB 2780)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Severability [2218. - 2218.]

2218.

(a) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   (AB 2780)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 8. INVOLUNTARY TRUSTS [2223. - 2225.]

2223.

One who wrongfully detains a thing is an involuntary trustee thereof, for the benefit of the owner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 820, Sec. 8.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------

2224.

One who gains a thing by fraud, accident, mistake, undue influence, the violation of a trust, or other wrongful act, is, unless he or she has some other and better right thereto, an involuntary trustee of the thing gained, for the benefit of the person who would otherwise have had it.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 820, Sec. 8.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------

2224.5.

An action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 2223 or 2224 may be brought at any time within 10 years after the cause of action accrued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 299, Sec. 2.   (AB 556)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2225.

(a) As used in this section:
